Oklahoma, session 2025, SB16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-600 of Title 14A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma Second


Amendment Financial Privacy Act”.





Req. No. 19 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-600.1 of Title 14A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Ammunition” means ammunition or cartridge cases, primers,


bullets, or propellant powder designed for use in any firearm;


2. “Assign” or “assignment” refers to a covered entity’s


policy, process, or practice that labels, links, or otherwise


associates a merchant category code with a merchant or a payment


card transaction in a manner that allows the covered entity or any


other entity facilitating or processing the payment card transaction


to identity whether a merchant is a firearm retailer or whether a


transaction involves the sale of firearms or ammunition;


3. “Covered entity” means an entity, or agent of an entity,


that establishes a relationship with a retailer for the purpose of


processing credit, debit, or prepaid transactions;


4. “Firearm” has the same meaning as in Section 1289.1 et seq.


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. “Firearm retailer” means any person or entity that is


physically located in this state and is engaged in the lawful


selling or trading of firearms, antique firearms, or ammunition to


be used in firearms or antique firearms;


6. “Government entity” means any state agency or political


subdivision, or agency thereof, located in this state;

Req. No. 19 Page 2


7. “Merchant category code” means the code, approved by the


international organization for standardization, or an equivalent


successor organization specifically for firearm retailers, that is


assigned to a retailer based on the types of goods and services


offered to a retailer’s customers;


8. “Payment card” means credit card, charge card, debit card,


or any other card that is issued to a customer and allows the


customer to purchase goods or services from a merchant;


9. “Payment card network” means an entity, or agent of the


entity, that provides the proprietary services, infrastructure, and


software to conduct credit or debit card transaction authorizations,


clearances, and settlements and that another entity uses to accept


as a form of payment a brand of credit card, debit card, or other


devices that may be used to carry out credit or debit transactions;


and


10. “Payment card transaction” means any transaction in which a


payment card is accepted as payment.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-600.2 of Title 14A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Except for those records kept during the regular course of a


criminal investigation and prosecution, or as otherwise required by


law, no government entity or official and no agent or employee of a


government entity shall knowingly keep or cause to be kept any list,

Req. No. 19 Page 3


record, or registry of privately owned firearms or the owners of


those firearms.


B. A payment card network shall not require or incentivize the


use of a merchant category code in a manner that distinguishes a


firearm retailer from other retailers.


C. A covered entity shall not assign a firearm retailer a


merchant category code that distinguishes the firearm retailer from


other retailers.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-600.3 of Title 14A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Attorney General shall investigate reasonable


allegations that a person, entity, or government entity has violated


the provisions of this act and, upon finding violation, provide


written notice to the person, entity, or government entity alleged


to have committed the violation. The person, entity, or government


entity shall cease the violation within thirty (30) business days


after receiving written notice from the Attorney General pursuant to


this section.


B. 1. If a person, entity, or government entity does not cease


the violation within the thirty (30) business days after receiving


written notice from the Attorney General pursuant to this section,


the Attorney General shall file an action against that person,


entity, or government entity.

Req. No. 19 Page 4


2. If the court finds the person, entity, or government entity


violated the provisions of this act and has not ceased the activity


constituting the violation, the court shall enjoin the person,


entity, or government entity from continuing such activity and shall


award attorney fees and costs.


3. If a person, entity, or government entity purposely fails to


comply with an injunction issued pursuant to paragraph 2 of this


subsection after thirty (30) business days of being served with the


injunction, the Attorney General, upon petition to the court, shall


seek to impose on that person, entity, or government entity a civil


fine in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per


violation. In assessing such a civil fine, the court shall consider


factors resulting from the violation, including the financial


resources of the violator and the harm or risk of harm to the rights


provided under this act and Section 26 of Article II of the Oklahoma


Constitution.


4. Any order assessing a civil fine pursuant to paragraph 3 of


this subsection shall be stayed pending appeal of the order.


C. The Attorney General has exclusive authority to enforce the


provisions of this act. The remedies set forth in this section are


the exclusive remedies of any violation of this act.


D. It shall be a defense to a proceeding initiated pursuant to


this section that a merchant category code was required to be


permitted or assigned by law.

Req. No. 19 Page 5


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-19 CD 12/9/2024 4:35:36 PM











































Req. No. 19 Page 6